Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.145.070

Reports—Review for legislative action.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1587-S2.SL) ***

(1) Annually each December 1st, the board, together with the program administrator, shall report to the council, the governor, and the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the rural jobs program and opportunity scholarship and opportunity expansion programs, including but not limited to:

(a) Which education programs the board determined were eligible for purposes of the opportunity scholarship and which high employer demand fields within eligible counties were identified for purposes of the rural jobs program;

(b) The number of applicants for the opportunity scholarship and rural jobs program, disaggregated, to the extent possible, by race, ethnicity, gender, county of origin, age, and median family income;

(c) The number of participants in the opportunity scholarship program and rural jobs program, disaggregated, to the extent possible, by race, ethnicity, gender, county of origin, age, and median family income;

(d) The number and amount of the scholarships actually awarded, whether the scholarships were paid from the student support pathways account, the scholarship account, or the endowment account, and the number and amount of scholarships actually awarded under the rural jobs program;

(e) The institutions and eligible education programs in which opportunity scholarship participants enrolled, together with data regarding participants' completion and graduation, and the institutions and programs in which recipients of the rural jobs program scholarship enrolled, together with recipients' data on completion and graduation;

(f) The total amount of private contributions and state match moneys received for the rural jobs program and the opportunity scholarship program, how the funds under the opportunity scholarship program were distributed between the student support pathways account, the scholarship account, and the endowment account, the interest or other earnings on all the accounts created under this chapter, and the amount of any administrative fee paid to the program administrator; and

(g) Identification of the programs the board selected to receive opportunity expansion awards and the amount of such awards.

(2) In the next succeeding legislative session following receipt of a report required under subsection (1) of this section, the appropriate committees of the legislature shall review the report and consider whether any legislative action is necessary with respect to the rural jobs program, the opportunity scholarship program, or the opportunity expansion program, including but not limited to consideration of whether any legislative action is necessary with respect to the nature and level of focus on high employer demand fields and the number and amount of scholarships.

[ 2018 c 254 s 8; 2014 c 208 s 7; 2011 1st sp.s. c 13 s 8.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2018 c 254: See note following RCW 28B.145.100.